Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1663
Petit jury; examination by judge; excess jurors.

The judge shall examine all jurors who appear for jury service. If, after all excuses have been allowed, there remain more than twenty-four petit jurors for each judge sitting with a jury who are qualified and not excluded by the terms of section 25-1650, the court may excuse by lot such number in excess of twenty-four as the court may see fit. Those jurors who have been discharged in excess of twenty-four for each judge, but are qualified, shall not be discharged permanently, but shall remain subject to be resummoned for jury service upon the same jury panel.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 7, p. 570;

C.S.1922, § 9101;

C.S.1929, § 20-1631;

Laws 1939, c. 18, § 16, p. 107;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1631;

R.S.1943, § 25-1631;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 10(4), p. 231;

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1631.03;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 20.

Objection to jury panel on ground there were not 24 jurors for each judge was not sustained. Bell v. State, 159 Neb. 474, 67 N.W.2d 762 (1954).